District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.20

Record retention requirements.

Evidence of the examination of title and determination of insurability for business written by a title insurer or title insurance producer and records relating to escrow and indemnity deposits shall be preserved and retained by the insurer or producer for as long as appropriate to the circumstances but not less than 3 years after the title insurance policy has been issued or 3 years after the escrow or indemnity deposit account has been closed. This section shall not apply to a title insurer acting as coinsurer if one of the other coinsurers has complied with this section.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2161, 57 DCR 6242
Nov. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 20-40, § 5(i), 60 DCR 12304
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-40 substituted “insurer or producer” for “insurer or agent” in the first sentence.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2161 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).